Illinois, session 104th, HB2672.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 51-1 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/1-1)  (from Ch. 122, par. 1-1)7    Sec. 1-1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8School Code.9(Source: P.A. 86-1475.)